South Dakota, session 2026, HB1166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 3-23:
Each member of an authority, board, or commission listed in § 3-23-10 shall file
an annual financial interest statement with the secretary of state on or before January
thirty-first of each year. The statement must disclose:
(1) Any source of moneys, business, or economic relationship that contributes more
than two thousand dollars to the gross income of the member's immediate family
in the preceding calendar year;
(2) Any enterprise in which the member, member's spouse, or person with whom the
member lives, controls more than ten percent of the capital or stock;
(3) Any position held as an officer, director, partner, or member of a governing board
of any corporation, firm, partnership, or other business enterprise or nonprofit
organization;
(4) Any contract or business relationship with the state or any political subdivision of
the state, or with any entity receiving grants, loans, tax rebates, or other financial
assistance from the state; and
(5) Any real property ownership interest generating an annual income exceeding ten
thousand dollars.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 3-23:
Any individual under consideration for appointment to an authority, board, or
commission listed in § 3-23-10 shall, as part of the application or nomination process,
disclose any information as described in section 1 of this Act. The disclosure must be
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.602.29 2 1166
submitted to the Office of the Governor and the applicable authority, board, or commission
before confirmation.
An individual who fails to disclose information as described in section 1 of this Act
may be removed from the authority, board, or commission, by the Governor.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 3-23:
If a member has a financial interest, as described in section 1 of this Act, involving
any item on the agenda of a meeting, a written disclosure of the financial interest must
be included in the meeting materials posted publicly in accordance with chapter 1-25. The
disclosure must identify the member, the nature of the conflict, and the agenda item from
which the member is to be recused.
If a member's financial interest involving any item on the agenda of a meeting of
an authority, board, or commission listed in § 3-23-10 is discovered during the meeting,
the member must be recused for the item on the agenda for which the member has a
financial interest.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 3-23:
A member who fails to file a required financial interest statement or amended
statement by the prescribed deadline is suspended from voting on any matter before the
authority, board, or commission until the required statement is filed. The secretary of
state shall notify the chair of the applicable authority, board, or commission and the
attorney general of any failure to file within seven days of the filing deadline.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 3-23:
A member who knowingly files a false or materially incomplete financial interest
statement under section 1 of this Act is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor, and the member
may be removed from the authority, board, or commission by the Governor.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 3-23:
The secretary of state shall transmit all financial interest statements filed under
this chapter to the Government Operations and Audit Committee. The committee shall
review compliance with the financial disclosure requirements of this Act on an annual
basis. The secretary of state shall provide a report to the committee on or before October
first of each year identifying:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.602.29 3 1166
(1) All members required to file statements under section 1 of this Act;
(2) All members who filed statements by the prescribed deadline;
(3) All members who failed to file statements by the prescribed deadline and the
duration of any voting suspension;
(4) Any referrals to the attorney general for potential violations; and
(5) Any recommendations for improving compliance with this Act.
Section 7. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 3-23:
On an annual basis, an authority, board, or commission listed in § 3-23-10 shall
receive a report from a contractor or internal counsel, regarding applicable state laws on
ethics and financial conflicts of interest.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.